dictsource/ie_rules
// Interlingua translation rules for Espeak
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

.replace
	à	á
	è	é
	ì	í

// Front vowels
.L01 e i é í ý

// GI: Unstressed i and u turn into semiconsonants before a following vowel; 
// 	e.g. Bulgaria, filatorio, persuader

.group a
	a	a
	ai	aI
	au	aU
	ar (_	'aR	// infinitives

.group á
	á	'a

.group e
	e	e
	ei	eI
	eu	eU
	@) e (r_	'e
	@) es (_S2	es

.group é
	é	'e

.group i
	i	i 
	i (A	j // turns into j if followed by vowel

	@) i (r_	'i

     &) i (c_   =i  // stress on previous syllable
     &) i (ca_  =i
     &) i (co_  =i
     &) i (da_  =i
     &) i (do_  =i
        i (fic_ 'i
        i (fico_ 'i

	-) im (_	'ezim

.group í
	í	'i
	_) í (n	i

.group o
	o	o
	oi	oI
	@t) o (r_	'o

.group ó
	ó	'o

.group u
	u	u 
	u (A	w // turns into w if followed by vowel.
	_t) u (i_	u

     &) u (la_  =u  // stress on previous syllable
     &) u (lo_  =u
 
.group ú
	ú	'u
	
// GI: DOUBLE CONSONANTS merge in pronunciation. 


.group b
	b	b
	b (b
	bil (_	=bil
	
// GI: c before e, i, y is pronounced like ts in 'hats' (or, optionally, like
// c in 'city'); otherwise like c in 'cats'; ch like ch in 'echo', 'chrome';
.group c
	c 	k
	c (c
	c (L01	ts
	cc (L01	kts
// GI: The digraph ch stands frequently for the sound of sh in 'English' 
//	and is respelled as sh; e.g. choc (sh-).
	ch	S // reduce deviation spellings by making ch standardized
	ch (l	k
	ch (r	k


.group d
	d 	d
	d (d
	_) des (AP3	dez
	_) de (C@P2	de
	
.group f
	f 	f
	f (f


.group g 
	g 	g
	g (g
	gh	g
	g (L01	dZ

	
// GI: h as in English (or, optionally, silent); after r and t, silent;
.group h
	h 	h
	h (h
     r) h
     t) h

     
// GI: like z in 'azure' (or, optionally, like g in 'gem' or like y in 'yes');
.group j
	j 	Z // like z in azure
	j (j


.group k
	k 	k
	k (k
	kh	k

.group l
	l 	l
	l (l


.group m
	m 	m
	m (m
	m (en_S3N	men

//	The sounds of g and k assimilate a preceding n as in English. 
.group n
	n 	n
	n (n
	n (k	N
	n (g	N
	n (q	N

.group p
	p 	p
	p (p
	ph	f

	
.group q
	q	k
	q (q


// GI: r like rr in 'merry' or, better, like r in Spanish 'caro';
.group r
	r	R // description too vague, so using standard r trill.
	r (r
	_) re (@P2	Re
	_) retro (@P5	Retro
	
// GI: like s in 'stay'; between vowels, the same 
// 	(or, optionally, like s in 'these'); 
//	e.g. sparse, abstruse, accusativo;
.group s
	s	s // s always s for simplicity.
	ss	s
	sh	S
	s (_S1  s

// GI:     as in English; ti before vowels, unless stressed or preceded by s,
//	 like tsy in 'he gets you' (or, optionally, like sy in 'we pass you'
//	 or like ty in 'we let you'); e.g. actor, garantia, question, 
//	but action, reverentia;


// GI: h as in English (or, optionally, silent); after r and t, silent;
.group t
	t	t
	t (t
	th	t // after t, h is silent.
	//ti	S // too variable, English S, French s, latin t, keeping t.
	tch	tS
	s) t (iA	t
	t (iA	ts

.group v
	v	v
	v (v

	
.group w
	w	v
	w (v

	
// GI: x like x in 'fox'; between vowels, the same 
//	(or, optionally, like x in 'exact');
.group x
	x	ks // always ks for simplicty.
	x (x

	
// GI: y unstressed before vowels, like y in 'yes'; 
//	otherwise like i in 'machine'; e.g. Yugoslavia, typo. 
.group y
	y (A	j // j before vowels
     A) y	j // ??
	y	i // i otherwise
	
	
.group z
	z	z
	zz	ts
